Utah statutes.
75-7-1102.   Electronic records and signatures.

The provisions of this chapter governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures, conform to the requirements of Section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7002) and supersede, modify, and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

